Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 14.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1007.12
Transportation allowance; calculation.

The department shall calculate a transportation allowance for each district equal to the lesser of:

(1) Each local system's general fund expenditures for regular route transportation and in lieu of transportation expenditures pursuant to section 79-611 in the second school fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal year in which aid is to be paid, but not including special education transportation expenditures or other expenditures previously excluded from general fund operating expenditures; or

(2) The number of miles traveled in the second school fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal year in which aid is to be paid by vehicles owned, leased, or contracted by the district or the districts in the local system for the purpose of regular route transportation multiplied by four hundred percent of the mileage rate established by the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to section 81-1176 as of January 1 of the most recently available complete data year added to in lieu of transportation expenditures pursuant to section 79-611 from the same data year.

Laws 2008, LB988, § 14.